California statutes. Education Code
(c) No child shall be required to participate in a standardized health assessment program if the parent or guardian of that child objects to that participation because the program conflicts with the religious beliefs of the parent or guardian. The objection shall be made in a written form and shall be included in a letter submitted to the coordinating center, acknowledging parental notice of the health assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49461.

The coordinating center at the California State University shall select a sample of schools that is demographically and ethnically representative of the state’s population to participate in the health assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49462.

The health assessment shall be conducted over a four-year period and shall be completed on or before December 31, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 430, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49463.

The California State University shall notify the parent or guardian of each pupil for whom the assessment has detected health problems and shall recommend further consultation with a physician. If there is no physician available, the coordinating center shall direct the parent or guardian to an appropriate medical referral. Under no circumstances shall a school, the California State University, or the University of California be held liable for the parent or guardian’s action, or failure to take action on seeking medical care for the identified health problem. This section is not applicable to alcohol, drug, and tobacco use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 430, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49464.

The State Department of Health Services and the State Department of Social Services shall be provided with scientifically valid results of the health assessment that may be used to base revisions of school curriculum, state health programs, and teacher and personnel training related to child health and development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1246, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

49465.

(a) The agencies enumerated in Section 49460 shall only be required to implement this article upon the availability of funds received from the private sector and state funds appropriated for the purposes of this article in a total amount sufficient to cover all costs relating to the implementation and continuing administration of this article.

(b) The California State University shall notify all participating entities, including school districts, the State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Services, the State Department of Social Services, and the University of California when sufficient funds are available to meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(c) All funds received from the private sector under this article shall be deposited in the State Treasury and are continuously appropriated to the California State University, which shall allocate those funds to participating agencies to reimburse those agencies for costs incurred in carrying out this article. The amounts allocated to the State Department of Education shall include amounts sufficient to reimburse participating school districts for any costs incurred pursuant to this article.

(d) No school district shall be required to participate in the assessments unless it is reimbursed from those funds for all costs incurred pursuant to this article.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that each fiscal year funds be appropriated to the California State University for the purposes of this article in an amount equal to the private sector funds received for those purposes for the relevant fiscal year, up to a maximum of one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) in state funds in any fiscal year. Under no circumstances shall state funds appropriated for the purposes of this article be apportioned in any fiscal year until the private funds necessary to fully fund the assessment required by this article have been received.

(f) Reimbursements pursuant to this section shall be limited to the amounts and purposes specified in the collaborative agreement described in Section 49460.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 430, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

49466.

No provision of this chapter shall apply to the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make that provision applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 5.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.6. The Seizure Safe Schools Act [49468. - 49468.5.]

49468.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Seizure Safe Schools Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49468.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Authorizing physician and surgeon” may include, but is not limited to, a physician and surgeon employed by, or contracted with, a local educational agency, a medical director of the local health department, or a local emergency medical services director.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(c) “School” means a public school maintained by a school district or county office of education, or a charter school.

(d) “Seizure action plan” means a written, individualized health plan designed to acknowledge and prepare for the health care needs of a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy.

(e) “Volunteer” means an employee who (1) has volunteered to administer emergency anti-seizure medication to a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy if the pupil is suffering from a seizure, (2) has been designated by a school or local educational agency, and (3) has received training pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 49468.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49468.2.

(a) (1) If a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy has been prescribed an emergency anti-seizure medication by the pupil’s health care provider, the pupil’s local educational agency, upon receipt of a request from the pupil’s parent or guardian, may designate one or more volunteers at the pupil’s school to receive initial and annual refresher training, based on the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (c), regarding the emergency use of anti-seizure medication from the school nurse or other qualified person designated by an authorizing physician and surgeon.
 There shall be no retaliation against any individual who chooses not to volunteer or who rescinds the individual’s offer to volunteer, including after receiving training.

(2) An employee who volunteers pursuant to this article may rescind their offer to administer emergency anti-seizure medication at any time, including after receipt of training.

(b) A school nurse or, if the school does not have a school nurse or the school nurse is not onsite or available, a volunteer who is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and who has received training as described in that paragraph, may administer emergency anti-seizure medication in accordance with this article to a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy if the pupil is suffering from
 a seizure.

(c) (1) The Superintendent shall, on or before July 1, 2023, establish minimum standards of training to recognize and respond to seizures, including training for the administration of emergency anti-seizure medication that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2). Every five years, or sooner as deemed necessary by the Superintendent, the Superintendent shall review the minimum
 standards of training for the administration of emergency anti-seizure medication that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2). For purposes of this subdivision, the Superintendent shall consult with organizations and providers with expertise in epilepsy and administering emergency anti-seizure medication and administering medication in a school environment, including, but not limited to, the Epilepsy Foundation, Epilepsy Foundations in California, the California School Nurses Organization, the California Medical Association, and the American Academy of Pediatrics.

(2) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:

(A) Recognition of the signs and symptoms of seizures and the
 appropriate steps to be taken to respond to those symptoms.

(B) Administration, or assisting with the self-administration of, an emergency anti-seizure medication, or a medication or therapy prescribed to treat the symptoms of seizures, seizure disorders, or epilepsy, including manual vagus nerve stimulation, approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, or any successor agency.

(C) Basic emergency followup procedures.

(D) Written materials covering the information required under this subdivision.

(3) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the most recent guidelines for medication administration
 issued by the department.

(4) A school shall retain for reference the written materials prepared under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2).

(5) The department shall include on its internet website a clearinghouse for best practices in training nonmedical personnel to administer emergency anti-seizure medication.

(6) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the volunteer at no cost to the volunteer and during the volunteer’s regular working hours.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any local educational agency or school, upon receipt of a parent or guardian’s request pursuant to subdivision (a), shall distribute a
 notice at least once but no more than two times per school year to all staff that includes all of the following information:

(A) A description of the volunteer request stating that the request is for volunteers to be trained to recognize and respond to seizures, including training to administer emergency anti-seizure medication to a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy if the pupil is suffering from a seizure.

(B) A description of the training that the volunteer will receive pursuant to subdivision (c).

(C) The right of an employee to rescind their offer to volunteer pursuant to this article.

(D) A statement that there will
 be no retaliation against any individual for rescinding the individual’s offer to volunteer, including after receiving training.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a volunteer rescinds the volunteer’s offer to volunteer or is no longer able to act as a volunteer for any reason, or if the placement of a pupil changes and the pupil no longer has access to a trained volunteer, an additional two notices per school year may be distributed to all staff.

(e) Pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), upon receipt of the parent’s or guardian’s request pursuant to subdivision (a), the local educational agency shall notify the parent or
 guardian that the parent or guardian’s child may qualify for services or accommodations pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program and shall assist the parent or guardian with the exploration of that option.

(f) The local educational agency may ask the parent or guardian to sign a notice verifying that the parent or guardian was given information about Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and that the parent or guardian understands that it is the parent or guardian’s right to request a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program at any time.

(g) If there are no volunteers at the pupil’s school pursuant to
 subdivision (a) the local educational agency shall notify the pupil’s parent or guardian of the pupil’s right to be assessed for services and accommodations guaranteed under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(h) This section shall not be construed to preclude the negotiation by collective bargaining of additional compensation for volunteers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49468.3.

(a) Before administering emergency anti-seizure medication or therapy prescribed to treat seizures in a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy, a local educational agency shall obtain from the pupil’s parent or guardian a seizure action plan that includes all of the following:

(1) (A) Authorization, in writing, for the medication to be administered to the pupil at school.

(B) Authorization pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be effective for the school year in which it is granted, and shall be renewed each school year, unless needed sooner.

(2) A copy of a statement, in writing, from the pupil’s health care provider that includes all of the following information:

(A) The pupil’s name.

(B) The name and purpose of the medication.

(C) The prescribed dosage.

(D) The method of administration.

(E) The frequency with which the medication may be administered.

(F) Detailed seizure symptoms, including frequency, type, or length of seizures that identify when the administration of an emergency anti-seizure medication becomes
 necessary.

(G) The circumstances under which the medication may be administered.

(H) Any potential adverse responses by the pupil and recommended mitigation actions, including when to call emergency services, including the emergency 911 telephone number.

(I) A protocol for observing the pupil after a seizure, including, but not limited to, whether the pupil should rest in the school office, whether the pupil may return to class, and the length of time the pupil should be under direct observation.

(3) How and where the emergency anti-seizure medication will be stored at the school.

(4) A signed
 notice verifying that the parent or guardian was given information about Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 49468.2, and that the parent or guardian understands that it is the parent or guardian’s right to request a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) or an individualized education program at any time.

(5) A signed notice verifying that a pupil’s seizure may be responded to, including with the administration of emergency anti-seizure medication prescribed to the pupil, by a nonmedical professional who has received training pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 49468.2.

(b) The school administrator or the school administrator’s designee shall notify the school nurse assigned to the school or local educational agency if an employee at the schoolsite administers an emergency anti-seizure medication pursuant to this article. If a school nurse is not assigned to the local educational agency, the school administrator or the school administrator’s designee shall notify the superintendent of the school district or the superintendent of the school district’s designee, the county superintendent of schools or the county superintendent of schools’ designee, or the charter school administrator or the charter school administrator’s designee, as appropriate, if an employee at the school administers an emergency anti-seizure medication pursuant to this article.

(c) (1) The school nurse
 assigned to the school or a nurse from the local educational agency shall collaborate with the parent or guardian of each pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy to create a seizure action plan pursuant to subdivision (a), if the pupil does not have an individualized education plan pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(2) If the school obtains written consent from a pupil’s parent or guardian, in accordance with Section 99.30 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the seizure action plan shall be distributed to any school personnel or volunteers responsible for the supervision or care of that pupil.

(d) The notification required pursuant to subdivision (b) and the seizure action plan created pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be kept on file in the office of the school nurse or a school administrator, in compliance with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49468.4.

Emergency anti-seizure medication or medication prescribed to a pupil to treat the pupil’s seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy symptoms shall be provided to the school with the label affixed by the dispensing pharmacy intact.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49468.5.

(a) Any local educational agency that designates volunteers pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 49468.2 shall ensure that each employee who volunteers under this article will be provided defense and indemnification by the local educational agency for any and all civil liability, in accordance with, but not limited to, that provided in Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code. This information shall be reduced to writing, provided to the volunteer, and retained in the volunteer’s personnel file.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided
 in paragraph (2), a person trained as required under subdivision (c) of Section 49468.2 who administers emergency anti-seizure medication or medication prescribed for seizure disorder symptoms in compliance with this article, in good faith and not for compensation, to a pupil diagnosed with seizures, a seizure disorder, or epilepsy who appears to be experiencing a seizure shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for the person’s acts or omissions in administering the emergency anti-seizure medication.

(2) The protection specified in paragraph (1) shall not
 affect any of the following:

(A) A person’s liability for an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(B) A person’s culpability for an act that constitutes a crime and is not specifically authorized by this article.

(C) The ability of a licensing board to take disciplinary action against a licensed health care professional for an act not specifically authorized by this article.

(3) Any public employee who volunteers to administer emergency anti-seizure medication pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 49468.2 is not providing emergency
 medical care for compensation, notwithstanding the fact that the employee is a paid public employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. District Medical Services and Insurance [49470. - 49476.]

49470.

The governing board of any school district or districts may provide, or make available, medical or hospital service, or both, through nonprofit membership corporations defraying the cost of medical service or hospital service, or both, or through group, blanket or individual policies of accident insurance from authorized insurer, for pupils of the district or districts injured while participating in athletic activities under the jurisdiction of, or sponsored or controlled by, the district or districts or the authorities of any school of the district or districts. The cost of the insurance or membership may be paid, from the funds of the district or districts, or by the insured pupil, his parent or guardian.

The insurance may be purchased from, or the membership may be taken in, only such companies or corporations as are authorized to do business in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49471.

If the governing board of any school district maintaining junior high schools or high schools does not provide or make available medical and hospital services for pupils of the district injured while participating in athletic activities, in accordance with Section 49470, the board shall notify, in writing, the parent or guardian of each pupil of the district participating in such athletic activities that the services are not provided or made available by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49471.5.

(a) If funding is made available for this purpose, the Legislature requests the University of California to design a study and conduct a representative sampling of pupil injuries from participation in high school athletic events over a period of three school years commencing with the 2000–01 school year. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the University of California consult with the State Board of Education and the State Department of Education regarding the design of the study and regarding the university’s procedure for ensuring the success of the project. The data shall be compiled and analyzed so as to permit valid conclusions to be drawn and recommendations to be made regarding, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The actual statewide frequency of injuries and reinjuries.

(2) Methods for creating intervention programs to decrease the incidence of injuries.

(3) The number and extent of training of primary health personnel responsible for the care of athletes at the high schools.

(4) Possible methods for decreasing health care costs due to improper evaluation and care of athletic injuries.

(5) Identifying risk factors for high school athletes including factors relating to the severity of injuries, the immediate evaluation, care, and treatment of injuries, and the time loss associated with injuries.

(6) Recommended programs, policies, and procedures designed to provide long-term solutions for preventing injuries to high school athletes.

(7) Developing an athletic safety plan, including, but not limited to, written safety standards of care for high school athletes.

(b) The completed project, including an executive summary, key findings, conclusions, and recommendations, shall be disseminated to all public high schools in the state, and shall be submitted to the Legislature and the State Board of Education by December 1, 2003.

(c) The annual General Fund costs of the program shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(d) This section shall apply to the University of California only if its participation is approved by resolution of the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 940, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

49472.

The governing board of any school district or districts which does not employ at least five physicians as full-time supervisors of health, or the equivalent thereof, may provide, or make available, medical or hospital service, or both, through nonprofit membership corporations defraying the cost of medical service or hospital service, or both, or through group, blanket or individual policies of accident insurance or through policies of liability insurance from authorized insurers, for injuries to pupils of the district or districts arising out of accidents occurring while in or on buildings and other premises of the district or districts during the time such pupils are required to be therein or thereon by reason of their attendance upon a regular day school of such district or districts or while being transported by the district or districts to and from school or other place of instruction, or while at any other place as an incident to school-sponsored activities and while being transported to, from and between such places. No pupils shall be compelled to accept such service without his consent, or if a minor without the consent of his parent or guardian. The cost of the insurance or membership may be paid, from the funds of the district or districts, or by the insured pupil, his parent or guardian.

Such insurance may be purchased from, or such membership may be taken in, only such companies or corporations as are authorized to do business in California.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49473.

To facilitate the authority referred to in Sections 49470 and 49472 the governing board of the school district or school districts may authorize the distribution by district personnel of such printed matter as may be furnished by the insurer or membership corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49474.

The governing board of any school district or districts may provide, or make available, ambulance service, paid for out of school district funds, for pupils, instructors, spectators, and other individuals in attendance at athletic activities under the jurisdiction of, or sponsored or controlled by, the district or districts or the authorities of any school of the district or districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49475.

(a) If a school district, charter school, or private school elects to offer an athletic program, the school district, charter school, or private school shall comply with both of the following:

(1) An athlete who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or head injury in an athletic activity shall be immediately removed from the athletic activity for the remainder of the day, and shall not be permitted to return to the athletic activity until he or she is evaluated by a licensed health care provider. The athlete shall not be permitted to return to the athletic activity until he or she receives written clearance to return to the athletic activity from a licensed health care provider. If the licensed health care provider
 determines that the athlete sustained a concussion or a head injury, the athlete shall also complete a graduated return-to-play protocol of no less than seven days in duration under the supervision of a licensed health care provider. The California Interscholastic Federation is urged to work in consultation with the American Academy of Pediatrics and the American Medical Society for Sports Medicine to develop and adopt rules and protocols to implement this paragraph.

(2) On a yearly basis, a concussion and head injury information sheet shall be signed and returned by the athlete and the athlete’s parent or guardian before the athlete initiates practice or competition.

(b) As used in this section, “licensed health care provider” means a licensed health care provider who is trained in the management of concussions and is acting within the scope of his or her practice.

(c) This section does not apply to an athlete engaging in an athletic activity during the regular schoolday or as part of a physical education course required pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 51220.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 165, Sec. 3.   (AB 2127)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49476.

(a) If a school district, charter school, or private school elects to offer an athletic program, the school district, charter school, or private school shall annually give the Opioid Factsheet for Patients published by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to each athlete. The athlete and, if the athlete is 17 years of age or younger, the athlete’s parent or guardian shall sign a document acknowledging receipt of the Opioid Factsheet for Patients and return that document to the school district, charter school, or private school before the athlete initiates practice or competition. The Opioid Factsheet for Patients may be sent and returned through an electronic medium, including, but not limited to, fax or email.

(b) This section does not
 apply to an athlete engaging in an athletic activity during the regular schoolday or as part of a physical education course required pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 51220.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 693, Sec. 12.   (SB 1109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Notice to School of Nonepisodic Condition [49480. - 49480.]

49480.

The parent or legal guardian of any public school pupil on a continuing medication regimen for a nonepisodic condition, shall inform the school nurse or other designated certificated school employee of the medication being taken, the current dosage, and the name of the supervising physician. With the consent of the parent or legal guardian of the pupil, the school nurse may communicate with the physician and may counsel with the school personnel regarding the possible effects of the drug on the child’s physical, intellectual, and social behavior, as well as possible behavioral signs and symptoms of adverse side effects, omission, or overdose. The superintendent of each school district shall be responsible for informing parents of all pupils of the requirements of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. School Breakfast and Lunch Program [49490. - 49494.]

49490.

The Legislature finds and declares that hunger and malnutrition among children from low-income families constitute one of the most critical child health problems in the state; that federal programs to meet child nutrition needs are providing nourishing meals to thousands of the state’s poverty area children who previously could not participate in school lunch programs; that federal funds allocated for child nutrition to California are inadequate to meet critical needs; that the state and local communities bear a responsibility towards meeting these needs; and that the physical well-being of all of the children of the state is a matter of public concern and expenditures to secure such well-being serves a public purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49491.

No amount received by a school district or other public or private nonprofit school pursuant to this article or the National School Lunch Program shall be used to reduce the level of district or school expenditures for any existing program of free or reduced-price meals, unless free or reduced-price lunches are provided for each eligible needy child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49492.

A school district or other public or private nonprofit school or agency receiving reimbursement pursuant to this article shall meet standards adopted by the Superintendent for all of the following:

(a) The definition of a “nutritionally adequate breakfast.”

(b) The definition of a “nutritionally adequate lunch.”

(c) Standards for determining the eligibility of children to receive free or reduced-price meals.

(d) Standards for the protection of the identity of children for whom reimbursement is made pursuant to this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 3.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49493.

No allocation or reimbursement of funds shall be made pursuant to this article to any public or private nonprofit school or agency in behalf of any child who resides on the premises of such school or agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49494.

Notwithstanding Section 49493, an allocation shall be made pursuant to this article for a ward or dependent of the court who resides in a probation camp, ranch, juvenile hall, or county operated children’s emergency shelter. The department shall make an allocation for these purposes to a county probation department and welfare agency from funds appropriated to the department for the 1999–2000 fiscal year by crediting the county probation department or welfare agency commencing on July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   Effective May 8, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Breakfast and Morning Snacks for Nonschoolaged Children [49495. - 49496.]

49495.

(a) The department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, develop guidance for local educational agencies participating in the federal School Breakfast Program that maintain kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive, on how to serve eligible nonschoolaged children breakfast or a morning snack at a local educational agency schoolsite.

(b) The guidance shall highlight opportunities to maximize federal reimbursement through the federal School Breakfast Program and the federal Child and Adult Care Food Program.

(c) A guardian of an eligible nonschoolaged child shall be present at the local educational agency schoolsite in order for the nonschoolaged
 child to receive breakfast or a morning snack at the schoolsite pursuant to this section.

(d) The department shall, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, develop the guidance in a manner that does not jeopardize federal funding for school meal programs and that maximizes federal meal reimbursement.

(e) The department shall post the guidance on its internet website by July 1, 2023. The department is not required to mail the guidance to local educational agencies.

(f) This section does not require a local educational agency to take any action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 905, Sec. 3.   (AB 558)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49496.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Eligible nonschoolaged child” means a child who is not enrolled in school and who is a sibling, half sibling, or stepsibling of, or a foster child residing with, a pupil who meets the federal eligibility criteria for a free or reduced-price breakfast at a local educational agency participating in the federal School Breakfast Program that maintains kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(b) “Guardian” means a parent, stepparent, grandparent, or other adult family member or caretaker who is caring for an eligible nonschoolaged child.

(c) “Local educational agency”
 means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 905, Sec. 3.   (AB 558)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Meals [49501.5. - 49507.]

49501.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, commencing with the 2022–23 school year all of the following shall apply:

(1) (A) (i) A school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall make available a nutritionally adequate breakfast and a nutritionally adequate lunch free of charge and with adequate time to eat, as determined by that school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school in consideration of the recommendations provided by the department pursuant to subdivision (e), during each schoolday to any pupil who requests a meal without consideration of the pupil’s eligibility for a federally funded
 free or reduced-price meal, except as described in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B), with a maximum of one free breakfast meal and one free lunch meal, except for family daycare homes that shall be reimbursed for 75 percent of the meals served. The meals made available under this paragraph shall be nutritionally adequate meals that qualify for federal reimbursement. Participating school districts, county superintendents of schools, and charter schools shall comply with federal regulations for the National School Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program, which includes established mealtimes and shall comply with state requirements for meals served.

(ii) Meals served that do not meet federal requirements shall not be eligible for federal or state meal reimbursement.

(iii) Meals served that do not meet state requirements shall not be eligible for state meal
 reimbursement.

(B) (i) The department shall submit a waiver request to the United States Department of Agriculture to allow for one meal provided during a schoolday lasting four hours or less to be served in a noncongregate manner.

(ii) If the department receives approval for the federal noncongregate waiver required by clause (i), school districts, county superintendents of schools, and charter schools may make available either a nutritionally adequate breakfast or a nutritionally adequate lunch in a noncongregate manner for meal service combinations resulting in either (I) a congregate nutritionally adequate breakfast and a noncongregate nutritionally adequate lunch or (II) a noncongregate nutritionally adequate breakfast and a congregate nutritionally adequate lunch. These meals shall be reimbursed under the provisions of paragraph (2) if both state and
 federal requirements are met.

(2) (A) The department shall provide state meal reimbursement to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools that participate in, and comply with the requirements of, the federal School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program, and any applicable state laws and regulations. State meal reimbursement shall be provided for reduced-price and paid meals served to pupils, as described in subdivision (b).

(B) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to this paragraph, school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall conduct direct certification matching through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System on a monthly basis.

(b) The amount of per-meal reimbursements provided under this section shall
 not exceed the difference between the sum of the amounts calculated from meals claimed based on the free combined breakfast and lunch reimbursement rates established by the United States Department of Agriculture and state meal contribution established in Section 49559, and the combined federal and state amounts reimbursed for reduced-price and paid meals claimed.

(c) The reimbursement required pursuant to this section shall be provided upon appropriation by the Legislature. This section shall not be operative until the Legislature has appropriated funds for purposes of this section.
